Utah statutes.
13-15-3.   Administration and enforcement -- Powers -- Legal counsel -- Fees.

(1)  The division shall administer and enforce this chapter.  In the exercise of its responsibilities, the division shall enjoy the powers, and be subject to the constraints, set forth in Title 13, Chapter 2, Division of Consumer Protection.

(2)  The attorney general, upon request, shall give legal advice to, and act as counsel for, the division in the exercise of its responsibilities under this chapter.

(3)  All fees collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the Commerce Service Account created by Section 13-1-2.

